Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 75-301 to 75-343 and in all rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission pursuant to such sections, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Attended services means an attendant or caregiver accompanying a minor or a person who has a physical, mental, or developmental disability and is unable to travel or wait without assistance or supervision;

(2) Carrier enforcement division means the carrier enforcement division of the Nebraska State Patrol or the Nebraska State Patrol;

(3) Certificate means a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under Chapter 75, article 3, to common carriers by motor vehicle;

(4) Civil penalty means any monetary penalty assessed by the commission or carrier enforcement division due to a violation of Chapter 75, article 3, or section 75-126 as such section applies to any person or carrier specified in Chapter 75, article 3; any term, condition, or limitation of any certificate or permit issued pursuant to Chapter 75, article 3; or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, the Division of Motor Carrier Services, or the carrier enforcement division issued pursuant to Chapter 75, article 3;

(5) Commission means the Public Service Commission;

(6) Common carrier means any person who or which undertakes to transport passengers for the general public in intrastate commerce by motor vehicle for hire, whether over regular or irregular routes, upon the highways of this state. Common carrier does not include:

(a) A motor carrier operating under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.03; and

(b) A motor carrier that is engaged in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services under a license that was issued pursuant to section 75-311;

(7) Contract carrier means any motor carrier that transports passengers for hire other than as a common carrier designed to meet the distinct needs of each individual customer or a specifically designated class of customers without any limitation as to the number of customers it can serve within the class. Contract carrier does not include:

(a) A motor carrier operating under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.04; and

(b) A motor carrier that is engaged in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services under a license that was issued pursuant to section 75-311;

(8) Division of Motor Carrier Services means the Division of Motor Carrier Services of the Department of Motor Vehicles;

(9) Highway means the roads, highways, streets, and ways in this state;

(10) Household goods means personal effects and property used or to be used in a dwelling, when a part of the equipment or supply of such dwelling, and similar property as the commission may provide by regulation if the transportation of such effects or property, is:

(a) Arranged and paid for by the householder, including transportation of property from a factory or store when the property is purchased by the householder with the intent to use in his or her dwelling; or

(b) Arranged and paid for by another party;

(11) Intrastate commerce means commerce between any place in this state and any other place in this state and not in part through any other state;

(12) License means a license issued to:

(a) A motor carrier engaged in the for-hire, intrastate transportation of household goods under section 75-304.03;

(b) A motor carrier engaged in the for-hire, intrastate transportation of employees of a railroad carrier engaged in interstate commerce to or from their work locations under section 75-304.04; or

(c) A motor carrier, or person, engaged in the for-hire intrastate transportation of individuals, including contractors and agents of the Department of Health and Human Services, for the purpose of providing intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services under a license that was issued pursuant to section 75-311;

(13) Licensed care transportation services means transportation provided by an entity licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services as a residential child-caring agency as defined in section 71-1926 or child-placing agency as defined in section 71-1926 or a child care facility licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act to a client of the entity or facility when the person providing transportation services also assists and supervises the passenger or, if the client is a minor, to a family member of a minor when it is necessary for agency or facility staff to accompany or facilitate the transportation in order to provide necessary services and support to the minor. Licensed care transportation services must be incidental to and in furtherance of the social services provided by the entity or facility to the transported client;

(14) Motor carrier means any person other than a regulated motor carrier who or which owns, controls, manages, operates, or causes to be operated any motor vehicle used to transport passengers or property over any public highway in this state;

(15) Motor vehicle means any vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power and used upon the highways in the transportation of passengers or property but does not include any vehicle, locomotive, or car operated exclusively on a rail or rails;

(16) Permit means a permit issued under Chapter 75, article 3, to contract carriers by motor vehicle;

(17) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, company, association, or joint-stock association and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal representative thereof;

(18) Private carrier means any motor carrier which owns, controls, manages, operates, or causes to be operated a motor vehicle to transport passengers or property to or from its facility, plant, or place of business or to deliver to purchasers its products, supplies, or raw materials (a) when such transportation is within the scope of and furthers a primary business of the carrier other than transportation and (b) when not for hire. Nothing in sections 75-301 to 75-322 shall apply to private carriers;

(19) Regulated motor carrier means any person who or which owns, controls, manages, operates, or causes to be operated any motor vehicle used to transport passengers, other than those excepted under section 75-303, over any public highway in this state. Regulated motor carrier does not include:

(a) A motor carrier operating under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.03;

(b) A motor carrier operating under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.04; and

(c) A motor carrier that is engaged in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services under a license that was issued pursuant to section 75-311;

(20) Residential care means care for a minor or a person who is physically, mentally, or developmentally disabled who resides in a residential home or facility regulated by the Department of Health and Human Services, including, but not limited to, a foster home, treatment facility, residential child-caring agency, or shelter;

(21) Residential care transportation services means transportation services to persons in residential care when such residential care transportation services and residential care are provided as part of a services contract with the Department of Health and Human Services or pursuant to a subcontract entered into incident to a services contract with the department;

(22) Supported transportation services means transportation services to a minor or for a person who is physically, mentally, or developmentally disabled when the person providing transportation services also assists and supervises the passenger or transportation services to a family member of a minor when it is necessary for provider staff to accompany or facilitate the transportation in order to provide necessary services and support to the minor. Supported transportation services must be provided as part of a services contract with the Department of Health and Human Services or pursuant to a subcontract entered into incident to a services contract with the department, and the driver must meet department requirements for (a) training or experience working with minors or persons who are physically, mentally, or developmentally disabled, (b) training with regard to the specific needs of the client served, (c) reporting to the department, and (d) age. Assisting and supervising the passenger shall not necessarily require the person providing transportation services to stay with the passenger after the transportation services have been provided; and

(23) Transportation network company has the definition found in section 75-323. A transportation network company shall not own, control, operate, or manage drivers' personal vehicles.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 2, p. 1375;

Laws 1969, c. 606, § 1, p. 2467;

Laws 1972, LB 1370, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 18;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 25;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 464;

Laws 1993, LB 412, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 22;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 43;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 66;

Laws 2006, LB 1069, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB358, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB112, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB265, § 45;

Laws 2015, LB629, § 23;

Laws 2020, LB461, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 89.
July 18, 2026
Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.

The Nebraska Public Service Commission is without jurisdiction or authority to fix rates and charges for motor vehicle carriers transporting livestock in intrastate commerce. Livestock Carriers Div. of M. C. Assn. v. Midwest Packers Traf. Assn., 191 Neb. 1, 213 N.W.2d 443 (1973).

In considering an application for a permit as a contract carrier, the Nebraska State Railway Commission is required to weigh the special needs of shippers desiring contract service against the adequacy of existing common carrier service. Wells Fargo Armored Service Corp. v. Bankers Dispatch Corp., 188 Neb. 584, 198 N.W.2d 195 (1972).